Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5134XS (3) 91 th/ns S.F. 2064 Section 1. Section 321.234A, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. As provided in section 321.1 , an all-terrain vehicle is 3 a motor vehicle for purposes of this chapter . Therefore, an 4 all-terrain vehicle operated on a highway shall be equipped 5 with the parts, lamps, and other equipment in proper condition 6 and adjustment as required under this chapter for motor 7 vehicles, including but not limited to the parts, lamps, and 8 equipment required under sections 321.383, 321.386 , 321.387 , 9 321.404 , 321.432 , and 321.437 . 10